Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

General Provisions

2-12-101. Commissioners — Appointment — Removal — Legal representation.

The state election commission shall appoint, on the first Monday in April of each odd-numbered year, five (5) election commissioners for each county, for terms of two (2) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. The five (5) commissioners shall be the county election commission.

The state election commission shall remove a commissioner who becomes unqualified and may remove or otherwise discipline a commissioner for cause.

County election commissions shall be represented in legal proceedings as follows:

If the legal proceeding names the county election commissioners as defendants and the lawsuit involves a municipal election, the municipality concerned shall furnish counsel to represent the commissioners;

If the election involved in the legal proceedings is that of a county election, the county shall furnish counsel for the commissioners and if the election involved in the legal proceedings attacks a state law or presents a question concerning a state or federal election, the attorney general and reporter shall represent the commissioners either by the attorney general and reporter's own staff or by such counsel as the attorney general and reporter may designate;

The counsel furnished, whether by municipality or county, shall be that chosen by the election commission unless the commission carries an insurance policy providing coverage of claims asserted in a lawsuit, in which case the provisions of the insurance policy control with respect to representation of the commission; and

If, in order to properly discharge its duties, the county election commission has to bring legal action against a county or municipality, the compensation for the commission's legal representation shall be borne by the county or municipality, as the case may be.

The county election commission created by this section is the immediate successor to the commissioners of elections for each county. Wherever in the Tennessee Code the commissioners of elections for counties are referred to, the term “county election commission” shall be substituted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, §§ 1, 7; 1974, ch. 535, § 1; 1979, ch. 316, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-1201; Acts 1980, ch. 609, § 6; 1993, ch. 208, § 2; 2019, ch. 44, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “unless the commission carries an insurance policy providing coverage of claims asserted in a lawsuit, in which case the provisions of the insurance policy control with respect to representation of the commission.” at the end of (c)(3) following “election commission”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 44, § 3. March 28, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 7.

Attorney General Opinions. Conflicts of interest involving state and county election commissions, OAG 06-159 (10/9/06).

2-12-102. Qualifications of commissioners.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2), persons appointed to the county election commission shall be registered voters who have been residents of the state for five (5) years and residents of the county for which they are appointed for two (2) years.

In counties having a population of not less than two hundred seventy-six thousand (276,000) nor more than two hundred seventy-seven thousand (277,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the persons appointed to the county election commission shall be registered voters who have been residents of the county for which they are appointed for two (2) years.

Any member of the county election commission who qualifies as a candidate for any public office while serving as a member of the commission shall automatically become disqualified to continue in office as a member of the commission, and a vacancy on the commission shall be considered to exist.

A person employed as an assistant public defender or an assistant district attorney may serve as a county election commissioner if such assistant public defender or assistant district attorney does not work in the district in which such assistant public defender or assistant district attorney lives.

Subsection (c) shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand four hundred (897,400) nor more than eight hundred ninety-seven thousand five hundred (897,500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 558, § 1; 1979, ch. 232, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 2-1202; Acts 2003, ch. 374, §§ 19, 20.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Restrictions on commission or board membership or service as election official, §2-1-112.

2-12-103. Political division of commission.

Three (3) members shall be members of the majority party and two (2) members shall be members of the minority party.

The members of the majority party on the state election commission shall appoint the persons who are required to be members of that party on county election commissions.

The members of the minority party on the state election commission shall appoint the persons who are required to be members of that party on county election commissions. The chair of the county election commission shall be a member of the majority party, and the secretary shall be a member of a minority party.

When members of another statewide political party are required to be appointed to a county election commission, they shall be nominated by the party's state primary board.

Before appointing county election commissioners, the members of the state election commission shall consult with the members of the general assembly serving each of the counties as to the persons to be appointed to the county election commissions.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 26, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1203; Acts 2016, ch. 1069, § 1.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added the second sentence to (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 1069, § 2. July 1, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. While T.C.A. §2-12-103(b)(4) requires the state election commission to consult with the local legislative delegation before appointing members of a county election commission, it does not mandate that the state election commission follow the recommendations of the local legislative delegation, OAG 05-049 (4/19/05).

2-12-104. Qualification by filing oath of office.

Persons appointed to the county election commission shall qualify within twenty (20) days after their appointment by filing their oath of office with the secretary of the state election commission. A failure to qualify shall vacate the office of the person failing to qualify.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1204.

Cross-References. Oaths of office, §§8-18-107 —8-18-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 7.

2-12-105. Organization.

Within twenty (20) days after their appointment, the county election commissioners shall organize by the selection of a chair and a secretary of different political parties from among them. The county election commission shall within ten (10) days thereafter report to the secretary of the state election commission and to the coordinator of elections the names and addresses of the officers and other members of the commission.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 8; T.C.A., § 2-1205.

2-12-106. Vacancies.

The county election commission shall give prompt notice of all vacancies to the state election commission, which shall appoint a new commissioner of the same political party as the vacating commissioner to fill the unexpired term.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1206.

2-12-107. Issuance of commissions of appointment — Records.

The state election commission shall issue to the county election commissioners commissions of appointment signed by the chair.

The state election commission shall keep records of the names and addresses of all county election commissioners and their officers, of dates of appointment, and of political affiliations of commissioners, and shall keep the oaths filed by the commissioners.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 754, § 5; T.C.A., § 2-1207.

2-12-108. Compensation.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2), each member of the county election commission shall receive each month from the county funds the following minimum amount as compensation for each day spent in the performance of such duties:

In counties of the first class, seventy dollars ($70.00);

In counties of the second class, sixty-five dollars ($65.00);

In counties of the third class, sixty dollars ($60.00);

In counties of the fourth class, fifty-five dollars ($55.00);

In counties of the fifth class, fifty dollars ($50.00);

In counties of the sixth class, forty-five dollars ($45.00); and

In counties of the seventh class, forty dollars ($40.00).

In counties having a population of not less than two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) nor more than two hundred eighty-eight thousand (288,000), and in counties having a population of not less than three hundred nineteen thousand six hundred twenty-five (319,625) nor more than three hundred nineteen thousand seven hundred twenty-five (319,725), according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent federal census, the chair of the county election commission shall receive three hundred fifty dollars ($350) per month and each other member of the commission shall receive three hundred dollars ($300) per month.

In counties having a population of eight hundred thousand (800,000) or more, according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chair of the county election commission shall receive one thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($1,150) per month, and each other member of the commission shall receive one thousand dollars ($1,000) per month.

The compensation may be increased by resolution of the county legislative body.

For the purpose of computing what amount of time entitles a commissioner to the minimum compensation as provided in subdivision (a)(1), such commissioner shall have worked not less than one (1) hour in any given twenty-four-hour period in order to be entitled to such payment. Payment shall be made for meetings which last less than one (1) hour if such meetings are required by statute in order to call or conduct an election, or to prepare the annual budget or meetings which are necessary if the election commission is involved in litigation.

The amount provided in this section, or a greater amount provided by resolution duly adopted by the county legislative body, shall be paid to the members for each day's attendance at meetings of the body, or a greater amount provided by resolution duly adopted by the county legislative body as a stated salary per month.

For the purposes of classifying the counties under this section, the population classifications established in § 8-24-101 shall be applicable.

The population of counties for purposes of this section shall be determined by the 1990 federal census or the most recent succeeding federal census or a special census as provided in § 8-24-102(c).

The above minimum compensation amounts shall in no way diminish a compensation already being paid that may be greater than the stated amount.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 754, § 8; 1979, ch. 306, § 5; T.C.A., § 2-1208; Acts 1980, ch. 609, § 5; 1984, ch. 623, § 1; 1986, ch. 514, § 1; 1987, ch. 173, § 1; 1988, ch. 931, § 1; 1999, ch. 197, §§ 9-11.

Code Commission Notes.

For the fiscal year county officials' salary schedule, see the County Technical Assistance Service web site at http://www.ctas.tennessee.edu.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Compensation of clerks and county officers, §8-24-102.

2-12-109. Expenses.

Except as otherwise provided by law, it is the responsibility of the county to fund the operations of its election commission. If a county fails to appropriate funds sufficient to pay expenses that are reasonably necessary for the discharge of the statutorily mandated duties of its county election commission, such commission may petition the chancery court of the county in which such election commission is located to compel the appropriation of such funds.

If the county carries an insurance policy for the county election commission, its employees, or its election officials, the election commission shall comply with the terms of the insurance policy with respect to expenses covered by the policy.

All expenses, including compensation of its employees and election officials, incurred by the county election commission or its members in the performance of duties under this title in holding municipal elections shall be paid out of the funds of the municipality upon the certification of the chair and secretary of the county election commission except as otherwise expressly provided. If a municipal election is held on the same day as a county-wide election, the municipality shall pay only the expenses caused by the municipal election which would not otherwise have been incurred in conducting the county-wide election as certified by the chair and secretary of the county election commission. If, after a legal proceeding involving a municipal election, the court finds that a subsequent election must be held due to an error committed by the county election commission, then the county shall pay the expenses of the subsequent election, unless the court finds that the county election commission's error resulted from the county election commission's reliance on information provided by the municipality.

If a special election is held for the sole purpose of choosing a member of the general assembly under § 2-14-202(b), all expenses, including compensation of its employees and election officials, incurred by a county election commission or its members in the performance of duties under this title shall be paid out of the state treasury upon the certification of the chair and secretary of the county election commission to the secretary of state; provided, that the secretary of state shall review the claim for expenses and only those items certified by the secretary of state to the comptroller of the treasury shall be paid.

All expenses, including compensation of its employees and election officials, incurred by a county election commission or its members in the performance of its duties under this title in connection with the presidential preference primary shall be paid out of the state treasury upon the certification of the chair and secretary of the county election commission to the secretary of state; provided, that the secretary of state shall review the claim and only those items certified by the secretary of state to the comptroller of the treasury shall be paid. In years in which a presidential preference primary will be held, if a political party elects to hold their county primary with the presidential preference primary, then all expenses of the county primary shall likewise be borne by the state upon certification as set forth in this subsection (d).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 474, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 754, § 10; T.C.A., § 2-1219; Acts 1983, ch. 345, § 1; 1986, ch. 562, § 21; 1986, ch. 930, § 6; 1996, ch. 603, § 1; 2003, ch. 374, § 18; 2011, ch. 182, § 4; 2019, ch. 44, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 44, § 3. March 28, 2019.

Attorney General Opinions. County election commissions: payment of expenses, OAG 99-206 (10/18/99).

2-12-110. Administration of oaths.

The county election commissioners may administer oaths in the performance of their duties.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1215.

2-12-111. Notices of elections.

The county election commission shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality in which the election is to be held, a notice of all elections, except special elections, not less than twenty-one (21) days before the qualifying deadline for candidates in the election which shall be named in the notice.

The county election commission shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county a notice of elections on questions not less than twenty (20) days nor more than thirty (30) days before the day of the election. The notice shall include in its entirety the resolution or other instrument requiring the holding of the election except for signatures or names.

The county election commission shall publish, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, a notice of every election, stating the day, time and polling places for the election, not more than ten (10) nor less than three (3) days before the day of the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1216; Acts 1981, ch. 478, § 20; 2011, ch. 412, § 6.

Cross-References. Newspaper of general circulation defined, §2-1-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 10.

2-12-112. Members of county commission in office throughout each election day.

In any county having a population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the members of the county election commission shall be in the commission office throughout each election day unless they are out for good cause.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1217; Acts 1993, ch. 518, §§ 2, 21.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

2-12-113. Names of election officials failing to serve submitted to grand jury.

The chair of the county election commission shall furnish the first grand jury sitting in the county after an election the names of all appointed election officials who failed to serve in the election and who did not notify the commission in advance that they could not. If an affidavit has been filed by an official with the commission setting forth why the official did not serve, the chair shall furnish it to the grand jury together with the chair's recommendation.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 9; T.C.A., § 2-1218.

2-12-114. Information provided for coordinator of elections.

Each county election commission shall provide to the coordinator of elections the following information by precinct beginning on June 1, 1995, and each six (6) months thereafter:

The number of active voters and the number of inactive voters at the beginning of the reporting period;

The number of active voters and the number of inactive voters at the end of the reporting period;

The number of new valid voter registrations for the reporting period. This number shall not include duplicates, rejected registrations, and changes of names and addresses within the county; and

The number of active voters and the number of inactive voters purged during the reporting period.

Each county election commission shall on the same schedule established in subsection (a) provide to the coordinator of elections the following information for the county:

The number of registration applications received during the reporting period from the following categories of sources:

Those registering to vote in the county election commission office or other supplemental registrations held by or on behalf of the county election commission;

The department of safety, motor vehicle offices;

By-mail registration;

Public assistance agencies serving as voter registration agencies. This includes the following state departments: human services, mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disabilities, health, and veterans services;

State-funded agencies primarily serving persons with disabilities;

Armed forces recruitment offices; and

Passive registration agencies: public libraries, county clerks, and registers of deeds;

The number of duplicate registration applications received during the six-month period from the same categories of sources; and

The number of confirmation notices mailed out during the six-month period and the number of responses received to those confirmation notices.

Acts 1979, ch. 317, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1221; Acts 1995, ch. 76, § 1; 2011, ch. 158, § 1; 2012, ch. 575, § 1; 2015, ch. 24, § 7.

Compiler's Note. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 7 provided that the Tennessee Code Commission is requested to change references in Tennessee Code Annotated, as volumes are replaced and supplements are issued, from “veterans' affairs” and “veterans affairs” to “veterans services” wherever the language appears in reference to the name or commissioner of the Tennessee department of veterans services.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “veterans services” for “veterans affairs” at the end of (b)(1)(D).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 24, § 9. July 1, 2015.

2-12-115. Holdover powers of county election commission upon subdivision of county.

In all cases not otherwise provided for, when fractions of counties have been cut off to establish a new county, the county election commission of each old county shall, until the next apportionment of representatives, hold all elections for governor, members of congress, and members of the general assembly.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1220.

2-12-116. Duty to promote voter registration and the electoral process.

The county election commission shall promulgate such policies as are necessary to aid the personnel of the election commission office in the performance of their duties with regard to the promotion of voter registration and the electoral process. These duties shall include the following:

The commission shall appoint an administrator of elections, who shall be the chief administrative officer of the commission and shall be responsible for the daily operations of the commission office and the execution of all elections. After May 31, 1993, any administrator appointed at large for the first time to such position shall possess a high school education or GED(R). In evaluating a prospective appointee, the commission shall consider the knowledge and experience of such prospective appointee in the following areas: administrative, managerial, instructional, communication, budgetarial, purchasing, promotional, legal and general office skills and other related skills necessary to fulfill the statutory requirements of administrator;

Upon the recommendation of the administrator, the commission shall approve an annual budget for the operation of the election commission;

Upon the recommendation of the administrator, the commission shall be responsible for approving any voting equipment to be purchased by the county for use by the commission;

Upon the recommendation of the administrator, hire legal counsel if necessary to conduct the business of the commission;

The commission shall appoint voting machine technicians as required in § 2-9-103. A voting machine technician shall work under the direction of the administrator;

The commission shall certify all voting machines prior to each election and shall canvass all voting machines after each election;

The commission shall assist the administrator in designating polling places, precinct boundaries and, in conjunction with the primary boards and the administrator, shall assist in obtaining and appointing poll workers as needed for each election;

The commission shall be responsible for locking or sealing all absentee ballot boxes and shall retain possession of the keys for such boxes;

The commission members shall be available to assist election commission personnel upon request throughout each election day;

The commission may act as the central absentee counting board if the total number of absentee ballots to be counted is fewer than one hundred (100);

The commission shall be responsible for certifying the results of each election in regard to official tabulations and shall be responsible for certifying all expenses incurred in regard to the commission's responsibility in the performance of its duties for a presidential preference primary or a special election for the sole purpose of selecting a member of the general assembly;

The commission shall be responsible for the keeping and writing of the minutes of all commission meetings;

The commission shall be responsible for determining a uniform time for the opening of the polls;

The commission members shall not request, except in the event of an emergency, that the administrator employ members of the county election commission, their spouses, parents, brothers, sisters or children, including in-laws, of commission members as clerical assistants, absentee voting deputies, poll officials or as a member of the absentee counting board;

The commission shall be responsible for maintaining the security of the election commission office and any other rooms or facilities it may use in the performance of its duties, including all locks and keys. The commission may delegate this responsibility to the administrator; and

The commission members shall not appoint or hire, except in the event of and during an emergency, spouses, parents, brothers, sisters, or children, including in-laws, of the administrator as deputies, clerical assistants, absentee voting deputies, machine technicians, poll officials, or as members of the absentee counting board.

Acts 1993, ch. 518, §§ 1, 21; 1994, ch. 859, § 10; 1997, ch. 558, § 17; 2011, ch. 236, § 1; 2013, ch. 268, §§ 1, 6.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-12-117. Development of Internet based electronic filing process.

Each county election commission is authorized to develop, with the advice, assistance and approval of the registry of election finance, an Internet based electronic filing process for use by candidates for local public office and all political campaign committees for a local election in such county or in the municipalities located in such county that are required to file statements and reports with such county election commission.

Such system shall provide each candidate and political campaign committee with secure access to the electronic filing system and provide safeguards against efforts to tamper or change the data in any way.

Once the electronic filing system is completed and tested, the county election commission shall provide public notice that the system is operational and available for filers to commence use.

If a county election commission decides to develop such an Internet based electronic filing process, any and all costs for such development and Internet posting shall be an expenditure of such county election commission.

If a county election commission develops and implements an Internet based electronic filing process pursuant to this section, then the county election commission shall notify the division of elections in the secretary of state's office at least ninety (90) days prior to its use.

Acts 2004, ch. 898, § 1; 2015, ch. 177, § 1.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 177, § 2. April 16, 2015.